Hawaii statutes.
[§161-51] Administration of oath. When
a complaint is made to any prosecuting officer of the violation of this chapter
or the rules adopted pursuant thereto, the division head or the division head's
designee who issued the citation and summons shall subscribe to the complaint
under oath. [L 1986, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next